Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1408
Motor vehicle dealer's license; continuing education; requirements.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2026:

(a) Every person applying for an initial motor vehicle dealer's license shall have completed eight hours of continuing education authorized by the board within the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of application; and

(b) Every licensee applying for renewal of a motor vehicle dealer's license shall have completed four hours of continuing education authorized by the board within the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of application.

(2) Every application for the issuance or renewal of a motor vehicle dealer's license shall be accompanied by documentation, as prescribed by the board, of the completion of continuing education required under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The continuing education requirements of this section shall not apply to:

(a) A motor vehicle dealer whose primary business is the sale of salvage vehicles on behalf of motor vehicle insurers;

(b) A motor vehicle dealer that only buys and sells manufactured homes;

(c) A motor vehicle dealer that only buys and sells trailers; or

(d) A franchised new car dealer licensed by the board or any employee of such a franchised new car dealer.

Laws 2024, LB484, § 2.